apertium-skr.skr.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Saraiki

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
NOUN
VERB
PROPN
Adverb
Conjunction
Preposition
Adjective
Pronoun
Determiner
Auxilliary
Number
Punctuation
xwords

PATTERN NOUN
NounRoot[I,m] [<n><m>:] NounInflIrg
NounRoot[I,f] [<n><f>:] NounInflIrg
NounRoot[m,-unmarked,-I] NounInflMasc
NounRoot[f,-unmarked,-I] NounInflFem
NounRoot[m,unmarked,-I] [<n><m><sp>:]
NounRoot[f,unmarked,-I] [<n><f><sp>:]

LEXICON NounInflMasc
<n><m><sg><dir>:ہ
<n><m><sg><dir>:ا 
<n><m><pl><dir>:ے
<n><m><pl><dir>:اں
<n><m><sg><obl>:ے
<n><m><pl><obl>:یاں
<n><m><sg><voc>:یا
<n><m><pl><voc>:یو
<n><m><sg><abl>:یو


LEXICON NounInflIrg
<n><sg>:
<m><n><pl>:اں
<f><n><pl>:اں
<m><n><pl>:واں


LEXICON NounInflFem
<n><f><sg><dir>:ی
<n><f><pl><dir>:یاں
n><f><pl><dir>:یں
<n><f><pl><dir>:اں
<n><f><sg><obl>:ی
<n><f><sg><obl>:یاں
<n><f><sg><voc>:ی
<n><f><pl><voc>:یو
<n><f><sg><abl>:یو

PATTERN PROPN
ProperNounRoot[m] [<np><m>:]
ProperNounRoot[f] [<np><f>:]

PATTERN VERB
VerbRoot[unmarked]
VerbRoot [<v>:] VerbInfl

LEXICON VerbInfl
<sc><p1><sg><m>:واں
<sc><p1><sg><f>:واں
<sc><p1><pl><m>:ویں
<sc><p1><pl><f>:ویں

<sc><p2><sg><m>:و
<sc><p2><sg><f>:و
<sc><p2><pl><m>:ؤ
<sc><p2><pl><f>:ؤ

<sc><p3><sg><m>:وے
<sc><p3><sg><f>:وے
<sc><p3><pl><m>:وݨ
<sc><p3><pl><f>:وݨ

<dc><p1><sg><m>:واواں
<dc><p1><sg><f>:واواں
<dc><p1><pl><m>:واویں
<dc><p1><pl><f>:واویں

<dc><p2><sg><m>:
<dc><p2><sg><f>:
<dc><p2><pl><m>:واؤ
<dc><p2><pl><f>:واؤ

<dc><p3><sg><m>:واوے
<dc><p3><sg><f>:واوے
<dc><p3><pl><m>:واوݨ
<dc><p3><pl><f>:واوݨ

<pass><p1><sg><m>:یجا
<pass><p1><sg><f>:یجی
<pass><p1><pl><m>:یجے
<pass><p1><pl><f>:یجیاں

<pass><p2><sg><m>:یجا
<pass><p2><sg><f>:یجی
<pass><p2><pl><m>:یجے
<pass><p2><pl><f>:یجیاں

<pass><p3><sg><m>:یجا
<pass><p3><sg><f>:یجی
<pass><p3><pl><m>:یجے
<pass><p3><pl><f>:یجیاں

<pres><p1><sg><m>:ا
<pres><p1><sg><m>:دا
<pres><p1><sg><f>:دی
<pres><p1><pl><m>:دے
<pres><p1><pl><f>:

<pres><p2><sg><m>:دا
<pres><p2><sg><f>:دی
<pres><p2><pl><m>:دے
<pres><p2><pl><f>:دیاں

<pres><p3><sg><m>:دا
<pres><p3><sg><f>:دی
<pres><p3><pl><m>:دے
<pres><p3><pl><f>:دیاں

<infi>:ݨ
<infi>:ن

<infi>:یجݨ 
<irel>:ے
<pst><p1><m><sg>:یا
<pst><p1><m><sg>:ے
<pst><p3><m><sg>:ا
<pst><p2><m><sg>:یا
<pst><p3><m><sg>:یا
<pst><p1><f><sg>:ی


<ger><p1><sg><m>:ݨا

<impf><part><p1><sg><m>:یندا
<impf><part><p1><sg><f>:یندی
<impf><part><p1><pl><m>:یندے
<impf><part><p1><pl><f>:یندیاں

<impf><part><p2><sg><m>:یندا
<impf><part><p2><sg><f>:یندی
<impf><part><p2><pl><m>:یندے
<impf><part><p2><pl><f>:یندیاں

<impf><part><p3><sg><m>:یندا
<impf><part><p3><sg><f>:یندی
<impf><part><p3><pl><m>:یندے
<impf><part><p3><pl><f>:یندیاں

<impf><part><p1><sg><m>:ندا
<impf><part><p1><sg><f>:ندی
<impf><part><p1><pl><m>:ن٘دے
<impf><part><p1><pl><f>:ندیاں

<impf><part><p2><sg><m>:ندا
<impf><part><p2><sg><f>:ندی
<impf><part><p2><pl><m>:ن٘دے
<impf><part><p2><pl><f>:ندیاں

<impf><part><p3><sg><m>:ندا
<impf><part><p3><sg><f>:ندی
<impf><part><p3><pl><m>:ن٘دے
<impf><part><p3><pl><m>:ندے
<impf><part><p3><pl><m>:یندن
<impf><part><p3><pl><f>:ندیاں

<fut><p1><sg><m>:ساں
<fut><p1><sg><f>:ساں
<fut><p1><pl><m>:سیں
<fut><p1><pl><f>:سیں

<fut><p2><sg><m>:سیں
<fut><p2><sg><f>:سیں
<fut><p2><pl><m>:سو
<fut><p2><pl><f>:سو

<fut><p3><sg><m>:سی
<fut><p3><sg><f>:سی
<fut><p3><pl><m>:سن
<fut><p3><pl><f>:سن

<dsimpP><p1><sg><m>:ویندا
<dsimpP><p1><sg><f>:ویندی
<dsimpP><p1><pl><m>:ویندے 
<dsimpP><p1><pl><f>:ویندیاں

<dsimpP><p2><sg><m>:ویندا
<dsimpP><p2><sg><f>:ویندی
<dsimpP><p2><pl><m>:ویندے 
<dsimpP><p2><pl><f>:ویندیاں

<dsimpP><p3><sg><m>:ویندا
<dsimpP><p3><sg><f>:ویندی
<dsimpP><p3><pl><m>:ویندے 
<dsimpP><p3><pl><m>:ویندن
<dsimpP><p3><pl><f>:ویندیاں
<dsimpP><p3><pl><f>:ویندین

<fut><pass><p1><sg><m>:یساں
<fut><pass><p1><sg><f>:یساں
<fut><pass><p1><pl><m>:یسوں
<fut><pass><p1><pl><f>:یسوں

<fut><pass><p2><sg><m>:یسیں
<fut><pass><p2><sg><f>:یسیں
<fut><pass><p2><pl><m>:یسو
<fut><pass><p2><pl><f>:یسو

<fut><pass><p3><sg><m>:یسی
<fut><pass><p3><sg><f>:یسی
<fut><pass><p3><pl><m>:یسن
<fut><pass><p3><pl><f>:یسن







###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

PATTERN Adverb
AdverbRoot [<adv>:]

PATTERN Pronoun
PronounRoot [<prn>:] ProInfl
UnmarkedPronoun
LEXICON ProInfl
<m><sg><dir>:ݙا
<m><pl><dir>:ݙے
<m><sg><obl>:کوں
<m><pl><obl>:کوں
<m><sg><voc>:ݙیا
<m><pl><voc>:ݙیو
<mf><pl><abl>:اں

<f><sg><dir>:ݙی
<f><pl><dir>:ݙیاں
<f><sg><obl>:کوں
<f><pl><obl>:کوں
<f><sg><voc>:ݙی
<f><pl><voc>:ݙیو

<p3><m><sg><dir>:ندا
<p3><m><pl><dir>:ندے
<p3><m><sg><obl>:کوں
<p3><m><pl><obl>:کوں

<f><sg><dir>:ی
<f><pl><dir>:یاں
<m><sg><dir>:ا
<m><pl><dir>:ے


<p3><f><sg><dir>:ن٘دی
<p3><f><sg><dir>:ندی
<p3><f><pl><dir>:ندیاں
<p3><f><sg><obl>:کوں
<p3><f><pl><obl>:کوں

LEXICON PronounRoot
اون
می
اسا
تی
تُہا
اُو
او
اُنھ
انھ
ای
اس
تُسں
آپݨ
اُنہ
این
سا
تس
جی
تہا
اون
اون٘
اِنھ
اُو
اُون

LEXICON UnmarkedPronoun
توں<prn><p2><sg>:توں
آپ<prn><p2><pl>:آپ
میں<prn><p1><sg>:میں# Dir/LR
کون<prn><sg>:کون
کون<prn><pl>:کون
اوں<prn><sg>:اوں# Dir/LR
اُوں<prn><sg>:اُوں# Dir/LR
آپڑیں<prn><pl>:آپڑیں
تہاݙے<prn><p2><p>:تہاݙے
مَیں<prn><p1><sg>:مَیں# Dir/LR
جنہاں<prn><p3><pl>:جنہاں# Dir/LR
آپڑیاں<prn><p1><pl>:آپڑیاں
انہاں<prn><p3><pl>:انہاں
اپݨے<prn><p1><pl>:اپݨے
جِنھاں<prn><p3><pl>:جِنھاں# Dir/LR
آپے<prn><p3><p1>:آپے
اِیہو<prn><p3><sg>:اِیہو
اُوہ<prn><p3><p1>:اُوہ
آپڑاں<prn><p1><sg>:آپڑاں
خود<prn><p1><sg>:خود
اپݨی<prn><p1><m><sg>:اپݨی
بعضے<prn><p3><m><f><pl>:بعضے

LEXICON xwords

کو
ٻارہاں
بار
وال
آلی
وا
نی
ان
ہائے
آں
ءِے
ءِ
آلیاں
PATTERN Adjective
AdjectiveRoot[-unmarked] [<adj>:] AdjInfl
AdjectiveRoot[unmarked] [<adj>:]

LEXICON AdjInfl
<m><sg><dir>:ا
<m><pl><dir>:ے
<m><sg><obl>:ے
<m><pl><obl>:یاں
<m><sg><voc>:ے
<m><sg><voc>:یا
<m><pl><voc>:یو
<m><sg><abl>:یو
<f><sg><dir>:ی
<f><pl><dir>:یاں
<f><sg><obl>:ی
<f><pl><obl>:یاں
<f><sg><voc>:ی
<f><pl><voc>:یو
<f><sg><abl>:یو

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
رادھ
سدھ


وڳڑ
ویائ



کجل
ݙاڈھ
وݙ
 بد
 خالی
بی
  مٹھ
  سوکھ
  سئیں
  بر
  وݙ
  کال

  ݙاڈھ
  چٹ
  پرا

  بھڄد
  اوکھ

  ان٘دھ


  ودھ

  نک

  کمل
  سن٘ڄ
  سچ
  ڈھیر

  چن٘ڳ

  چٹ

  تت
  پور

  بھیڑ
  بھر
  بکھ
اُٻالھ





  نک
  مُونجھ
  موئ


  مریڑ

  لݙی

  گن٘ج
  کوڑ
  کھوٹ
  کھٹ
  کڄ

  کاݨ







  سوکھ


  سچّ

  ساو
  سار


  رُکھ
  ݙن٘گ


  چوڑ

  چھوٹ
  چھت



  
  جھیاں
  ٹرد
  تھوڑ

  تاز
  پک

  پرای

  ٻڈھ
  بھیڑ
  بھن

  بھار

  بدر
  اوتر






  ویلھ



  ورساند
  وݙیر



  وݙائی

  وِچار


  ہول

  ہن٘گد
  ہک
  ہری
  نو


  نن٘گ





  نماݨ

  نڳ
  نِکّ
  نکم
  نکل


  نر
  نٹھ






  موہݨ
  موکل


  موچل
  موٹ


  من٘د
  من
  ملّ
  






  
  ماڑ
  لن٘گڑ
  لن٘گ
  لن٘دھ
للّ
  لڑھد
 

  لاݙل
  لاتھ

  ڳور

  ڳن٘ڈھ
  ڳٹھ
  ڳالھ
  گھروڳ

  گھاٹ
  گن٘گ
  گند



  گجد

  گاب

 
  کویل

  کوڑ

  کوجھ

  کھل
  کھڑ


  کھٹ
  کھان٘د

  
  کلراٹھ
  کلجھ
  کڈھڑ
  کچّ





  کاݨ
  کال




  شین٘ہ

  شود

  شوخ


  سیاݨ



  سوہݨ
  سوڑ
  سوت
  سوبھ

  سنڄ
  سک
  سُک
  سُکھ
  سکھڑ



  سَکّ

  سک

  سڑ


  سِدھ




  ستّ

  سبھ
  ساو
  سانجھ




  رکھ
  رِدھ

  رڄ

  رُٹھ
  ݙیہد



  ݙونڳ
  ݙور

  ݙن٘گ
  ݙن٘دال
  ݙُکھ




  ݙٻی
  ݙاڈھ


  دل
  دای




  خال


  


 
 
  چوکھ

  چوپڑ
  چھوٹ

  چن٘ڳ





  چڑھ
  چٹ


  چِٻ
  چِٻر

  چالھ
  چاڑھ
  چار
  ڄیٹھ
  ڄمد
  
  جیݙ
 


  جھوٹھ
  جھُن٘گ
  جھل
  جِت

  ٹوٹ

  ٹھُل
  ٹھڈ
  ٹھڈھ




  ٹُنڈ





  تھول
  تھوڑ
  تن٘دول
  تل
  تَلو
  تریہای
  ترِکھ
  تت
  پیل


  پیار
  پوند

  پور
  پوچھل
  پہوڑ

  پھِک

  پنتال
  پلیٹھ
  پکّ
  پکّ
  پک
  پروتھ

  پراݨ

  پِچھاڑ
  پُٹھ
  پُٹھ
  پتل


  ٻوڑ
  ٻور
  ٻوجھ
  ٻݙد
  ٻڈھ

  ٻڈھڑ
  
  ٻدھ


  ٻئ
  ٻئ
  بیغان


  بھیڑ

  بھول
 
 

  بھمݨ
  بھل
  بھڄ
  بھان٘وݨ
  بھان٘د
  بھار



  بن٘د
  بگ
  بکھ



  بغان

چنڳ

 بس



 بر



 بُتھ
 اوکے
اوکھ
اوڈھر
اوتر
 اوپر
اِہج
اندھ
اَندھار
اڳل
اُکھڑ
اُݙر
اݙر
اُݙ
ادھ
اُچ
اُت
آڳا
کوݙ
آکڑ
آدھ
چنڳی

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot[unmarked]
سخی
صاف
چنڳا
بھنّاں
خوار
پکائی
خوار
سہی
بد
خوش
ٻَہوں
اندروں
بھت
ادھ
کلھا
لال
ڈھونگر
پاء
بو
بہشتی
بدناں
بدنام
بدرنگ
اوترک
اندروں
امیر
اُشاک
اڑیل
اُدھل
آسمانی
ہکو
حرام
پاک
اڈھائی
ادھ
ہک
نیک
مہربان
مݨ
گن٘د
فرمانبردار
غریب
ظالم
صاف
سیر
سخی
ذات
خوش
چپٹ
ترٹ
ٻہوں
بزاری
ولائتی
وسیبی
وادھو
نمازی
موذی
لال
لائق
گھٹ
گُمراہ
گار
کن٘جوس
غلط
عیب
شوم
سفید
روشن
رن٘گیل
دیسی
خیر
خراب
خاص
حلال
حقّی
جوان
ٹھیک
ٹھاڈل
ٹٹو
پاک
اصل
احمق
تیار
پوش

شوم


LEXICON AdverbRoot
# negative adverbs TODO: tag as <neg>?
ٻیٹھی
نیڑے
کݙاہیں
تلوں
نِھیں
نناݨ
کوئینی
کنیں
کتھائیں

کولھ
کائے
اݨ
نھیں
ہاں
نہیں
بھوئیں
ناں
نئیں
وِچ
نہ
کنوں
کہیں
وِی
اڳوں
کول
تاں
اڄ
پچھوں
کل
وی
اینویں
پہلے
ول
اڳے
پچھے
جیویں
اتوں
اڄاں
ٻاہروں
وت
ان٘در
توڑ
ڄَݙاں
اَتے
کݙان٘ہیں
ٻاہر
حالی
نت
اڄݨ
ودھ
اتھاں
ہمیشاں
جتھاں
پرے
اون٘ویں
یعنی
کیوں
بھانویں
اڳّوں
اڳیں
جینویں
ہُݨ
کتھاؤں
فر
ہولے
اُتھاں
جھڑی
اوہو
بھنی
زیادہ
کتھوں
بلکہ
مُتوں
بی
کئی
اُتھائیں
آکڑ
تلے
چن٘ڳی
ہݨیں
ٹھر
کیا
ذرا
ضرور
پن
ان٘جو
ہپ
وَل
انت
بھڄ
جیکر
ہݨ
ڈھیر
جتھوں
بعد
کٹ
اِیویں
اچاروں
ݙکاروں
وݙائی
ای
ہی
ایویں
ہمشیہ
ہمیشہ
تئیں
تکھی
مَٹھی
اڳوں
سوکھا
اوکھا
بُکھ
سدھا
سوجھلا
کیاں
خالی
فاقیاں
غماں
بادشاہی
کیویں
چڑھی
من٘گدی
چھکیاں
ڄُل
مول
ݙونہاں
جنتے
دے
اُتوں
بھان٘ویں
لتھا
پاروں
اڳلیاں
پچھلیاں
پا
لبالب
کھرے
شالا
گھروں
طرح
آڳوں
کتّیں
ساکھڑیاں
ٻہوں
گھٹ
ولا
لانّواں
ݙکّھے
پوری
چا
کیہاں
ان٘ج
ہک
تھو
ان٘ج
ٻس
وݙے
ایݙے
اوݙے
اُتّھوں
ٻِیا
کولوں
اُتھائیں
اتھائیں
جِتی
پورا
پاسے
سرے
رڄ
پروں
وچوں
بغانی
ٻہہ
اک
پچھوئیں
وقتی
نویں
ݙنگا
پر
چن٘ڳا
اَڳوں
محض
سویلے
چنگی
سدھ
شروع
توݨے
حالانکہ
اَڄ
وَت
بالکل
اِݙو
اُوݙو
ویلھے
اندر
کݙوں
اچانک
نال
پِچُّھوں
پچُّھوں
پچھیں
باوجود
اَحٖ
ٻیٹھے
اصلوں
واسطے
نالوں
ایݙوں
اوݙوں
وے
ٻہوں
متاں
ہیٹھ
سن٘ڳ
سن٘ڄیں
LEXICON ConjunctionRoot
تے
تاں
اَتے
اتے
اتے
ٻیا
ول
یا
پر
جیکر
تیں
